Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Prison Agricultural Enterprises

§ 47-5-351.
State policy; legislative intent; mission.

It is the policy of the State of Mississippi that the Department of Corrections, to the extent practical, make maximum utilization of the farm lands of the various correctional institutions for the purpose of feeding inmates.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the department grow, harvest and process those agricultural products that will directly assist in reducing the reliance of the department upon external sources of supply and that will facilitate the self-sufficiency of the inmates and the department.

The Department of Corrections shall establish, implement and manage prison agricultural enterprises in a manner and form deemed appropriate to ensure a profitable farming operation and self-sufficiency in the feeding of the inmates.

The Legislature finds that the mission of the prison agricultural enterprises is:

To reduce the cost of state government by producing and processing food for use by inmates;

To operate the program primarily with inmate labor;

To serve the security goals of the department through the reduction of idleness of inmates;

To produce and market agricultural products that will aid in maintaining a profitable agricultural operation to the extent possible.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 506 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 47-5-353.
Definitions.

For the purpose of Sections 47-5-351 through 47-5-357, the following terms shall have the following meanings unless the context shall provide otherwise:

“Agricultural commodities” means crops, vegetables, fruits, livestock, domesticated fish, fowl, seafood, animal husbandry, wood and the various processes that any of these commodities may go through subsequent to their removal from the soil or water.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Corrections;

“Department” means the Department of Corrections;

“Director” means the director of the prison agricultural enterprises;

“Prison agricultural enterprises” means any program operated by the Department of Corrections including, but not limited to, the growing, harvesting, processing and marketing of crops, vegetables, fruits, livestock, domesticated fish, fowl and any product of agriculture, animal husbandry or aquaculture that may be used for the feeding of prisoners for the general welfare of the prisoners or profitably grown on department lands. This term includes any proper method of canning, freezing or preserving such products;

“Products” means any item produced by prison agricultural enterprises.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 506 § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 339, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 11, 2001.).

§ 47-5-355.
Director of prison agricultural enterprises; duties and powers; records; annual report; joint ventures.

The Commissioner of Corrections shall employ a director of the prison agricultural enterprises, who shall be directly responsible to the commissioner. The director shall have the following duties and powers:

To implement and manage the prison agricultural enterprises;

To determine, with the advice of the Director of Planning, the type of agricultural, animal husbandry and aquaculture products needed to feed inmates and which may be grown profitably on department lands;

To use inmate labor to meet the labor needs of the programs, subject to the requirements of subsection (2);

To recommend rules and regulations and employ personnel necessary for the operation of the programs;

To determine the proper methods of canning, freezing or preserving that may be used to the best advantage of the programs;

With approval of the commissioner, to do those things necessary and proper to accomplish the purposes of the programs;

To determine and establish priorities on the most appropriate and profitable products to be grown and which department lands should be farmed, taking into consideration the available prison labor, existing equipment and funds available therefor, markets for the products, and other matters consistent with prudent agricultural practices;

To manage the food services of the department at the discretion of the commissioner.

The director shall have the right to use inmate labor to the exclusion of prison industries. The superintendents shall provide the prison agricultural enterprises with sufficient inmate labor. If a superintendent refuses to provide inmate labor because of security concerns, the commissioner shall decide if security requirements preclude use of inmate labor. Upon the request of the director, the superintendents shall provide security for prison agricultural enterprises.

The director shall maintain accurate and complete financial records of all receipts and expenditures of the prison agricultural enterprise programs.

The director shall file a full and complete report with the Legislature before January 1 of each year detailing the costs, inventory and receipts of each program. The report shall also provide the cost or cost savings of such programs.

The department may enter into joint ventures with private businesses related to prison agricultural enterprises.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 506 § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 47-5-357.
Purchasing policy; items exempted from bid requirements.

Due to the unique and time sensitive requirements of growing and harvesting products produced by the prison agricultural enterprises, the Department of Finance and Administration and the department shall establish a prudent purchasing policy which may exempt from bid requirements those commodities, items or services which are needed for the efficient and effective management of the prison agricultural enterprises.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall, by order entered on its minutes, list those commodities, items and services exempted from bid requirements as provided in Section 31-7-12, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 506, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).